Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
Only in extreme cases disclosing fundamental and prejudicial errors that prevented fair and impartial trial guaranteed by constitution will exception be made to statutory rule of law requiring timely objections and exceptions at trial, to secure consideration of such alleged errors on appeal. Loy v. State, 26 Wyo. 381, 185 P. 796,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1919).

In reviewing assertion that prosecutorial misconduct resulted in denial of a fair trial,

supreme court will view the case in its entirety, including an evaluation of the state of the evidence and the probability of prejudicial impact on the defendant under the circumstances of the particular case. Stogner v. State, 674 P.2d 1298,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1984).

Transfer of prisoner from industrial institute to penitentiary.
—

Statute empowering board of charities and reform to transfer prisoner in industrial institute to penitentiary if it should appear he had been previously convicted of crime becomes part of sentence as though extended into court record, does not deny due process and is not a change of sentence, but a carrying out of the original sentence. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Improper recording of preliminary hearing. —

Defendant's right to confront and cross-examine witnesses was not violated by the district court's refusal to remand for a second preliminary hearing because a complete recording of the original hearing was not available due to a breakdown of recording equipment. Sidwell v. State, 964 P.2d 416,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1998).

Law library access. —

Defendant's constitutional rights under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 were not violated when the trial court refused to require the detention center where defendant was housed to provide defendant greater access to the law library and legal materials; defendant failed to provide any documentary evidence that his demands for more library time were denied, and defendant's performance during the trial indicated that defendant was adequately prepared. May v. State, 2003 WY 14, 62 P.3d 574,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2003).

Due process violated in criminal contempt proceedings. —

Defendant's due process right to notice of criminal contempt charges was violated because (1) an order to show cause gave no adequate notice of the terms of the order defendant allegedly violated or defendant's alleged conduct constituting some violations, and (2) the error was compounded by a refusal to give defendant's counsel access to the juvenile court file containing the underlying order. Brown v. State, 2017 WY 45, 393 P.3d 1265,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2017).

Criminal conviction following juvenile adjudication. —

Protection against double jeopardy under
U.S. Const. amend. V and
Wyo. Const. art. I, § 11 was violated because defendant was adjudged
delinquent of sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree and then
criminally prosecuted and punished for the same offense.
Haynes v. State, 2012 WY 151, 288 P.3d 1225,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2012).

Applied

in

Connor v. State, 537 P.2d 715,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1975); Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979); Higgins v. State, 889 P.2d 964,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1995); Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1995); Yung v. State, 906 P.2d 1028,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1995); Bloomquist v. State, 914 P.2d 812,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1996); Daniel v. State, 923 P.2d 728,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1996); Baumgartner v. State, 7 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2000); Allen v. State, 2002 WY 48, 43 P.3d 551,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2002); Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002); White v. State, 2003 WY 163, 80 P.3d 642,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2003); Law v. State, 2004 WY 111, 98 P.3d 181,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(2004); Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008).

Quoted

in

King v. State, 780 P.2d 943,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1989); Skinner v. State, 2001 WY 102, 33 P.3d 758,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2001); Wilkie v. State, 2002 WY 164, 56 P.3d 1023,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2002); Morgan v. State, 2004 WY 95, 95 P.3d 802,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(2004).

Stated

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961); Small v. State, 623 P.2d 1200,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 295

(Wyo. 1981); Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Moore v. Jarvis, 44 Wyo. 92, 8 P.2d 818,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1932);
Betts v. Brady, 316 U.S. 455, 62 S. Ct. 1252, 86 L. Ed. 1595, 1942 U.S. LEXIS 489 (1942);
State v. Wilson, 76 Wyo. 297, 301 P.2d 1056,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1956);
State v. Benales, 365 P.2d 811,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1961);
Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974);
Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975);
Dryden v. State, 535 P.2d 483,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1975);
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977);
De Sersa v. State, 729 P.2d 662,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 645

(Wyo. 1986);
Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987);
Davila v. State, 831 P.2d 204,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1992);
Keene v. State, 835 P.2d 341,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1992);
Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992);
Gailey v. State, 882 P.2d 888,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1994);
Martinez v. State, 943 P.2d 1178,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1997);
Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999);
James v. State, 998 P.2d 389,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2000);
Lancaster v. State, 2002 WY 45, 43 P.3d 80,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2002);
O'Brien v. State, 2002 WY 63, 45 P.3d 225,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2002);
Sarr v. State, 2003 WY 42, 65 P.3d 711,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2003);
Lafferty v. State, 2016 WY 52, 374 P.3d 1244,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2016); Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Obligation of Securing a Speedy Trial,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 44.

For article, “United States Supreme Court — Public Defender by Judicial Fiat?,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 179 (1965).

For comment, “Criminal Law: Limitation of Prosecution — Time,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 179 (1970).

For comment on Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(1976), rehearing denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (1977), see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 319 (1977).

For case note, “The Standards for the Sixth Amendment Right to Effective Assistance of Counsel. Adger v. State, 584 P.2d 1056,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 551 (1979).

For case note, “The Confrontation Clause and the Catch-all Exception to the Hearsay Doctrine, Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 703 (1982).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Does the New Death Qualification Standard Ensure a Biased Jury? Wainwright v. Witt, 469 U.S. 412, 83 L. Ed. 2d 841, 105 S. Ct. 844, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 43 (1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 579 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Law — Right to Counsel at Preindictment Lineups — Should Wyoming Change Its Position? Charpentier v. State, 736 P.2d 724,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 437

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 541 (1989).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The Right to a Speedy Trial — Has the Wyoming Supreme Court Correctly Applied the Balancing Test? Harvey v. State, 774 P.2d 87,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1989),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 267 (1990).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — Witness Immunity — The Story
of a County Attorney Who Said, 'I Think I Can, I Think I Can,'
and
the Brave Little Conscience that Couldn't be
Shocked. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1992).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — The United States Supreme Court on Gender-Based Peremptory Jury Challenges — Constitutionally Correct But Out of Touch With Reality: Litigants Beware! J.E.B. v. Alabama ex rel. T. B., 144 S. Ct. 1419 (1994),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 195 (1996).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility, in state probation revocation proceedings, of incriminating statement obtained in violation of Miranda rule, 77 ALR3d 669.

Illness or incapacity of judge, prosecuting officer, or prosecution witness as justifying delay in bringing accused speedily to trial — state cases, 78 ALR3d 297.

Use of peremptory challenge to exclude from jury persons belonging to a class or race, 79 ALR3d 14.

Sufficiency of courtroom facilities as affecting rights of accused, 85 ALR3d 918.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of gagging, shackling or otherwise physically restraining accused during course of state criminal trial, 90 ALR3d 17.

Propriety of prosecutor's argument regarding other evidence not presented, 90 ALR3d 646.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecutor's argument giving jury impression that judge believes defendant guilty, 90 ALR3d 822.

Interference by prosecution with defense counsel's pretrial interrogation of witnesses, 90 ALR3d 1231.

Admissibility, as against interest in criminal case of declaration of commission of criminal act, 92 ALR3d 1164.

Racial or ethnic prejudice of prospective jurors as proper subject of inquiry or ground of challenge on voir dire in state criminal case, 94 ALR3d 15.

Accused's right to represent himself in state criminal proceeding — modern state cases, 98 ALR3d 13.

Loss of jurisdiction by delay in imposing sentence, 98 ALR3d 605.

Accused's right to depose prospective witnesses before trial in state court, 2 ALR4th 704.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding right to and incidents of jury trial, 3 ALR4th 601.

Right of accused in criminal prosecution to presence of counsel at court-appointed or -approved psychiatric examination, 3 ALR4th 910.

Availability in state court of defense of entrapment where accused denies committing acts which constitute offense charged, 5 ALR4th 1128.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding argument, 6 ALR4th 16.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding speedy trial and related matters, 6 ALR4th 1208.

Right of juvenile court defendant to be represented during court proceedings by parent, 11 ALR4th 719.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding appellate and postconviction remedies, 15 ALR4th 582.

Prosecutor's reference in opening statement to matters not provable or which he does not attempt to prove as ground for relief, 16 ALR4th 810.

Continuances at instance of state public defender or appointed counsel over defendant's objections as excuse for denial of speedy trial, 16 ALR4th 1283.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of witness testifying while in prison attire, 16 ALR4th 1356.

Circumstances giving rise to prejudicial conflict of interests between criminal defendant and defense counsel — state cases, 18 ALR4th 360.

Denial of, or interference with, accused's right to have attorney initially contact accused, 18 ALR4th 669.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney — drunk driving cases, 18 ALR4th 705.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney — cases involving offenses other than drunk driving, 18 ALR4th 743.

Admissibility of expert or opinion testimony on battered wife or battered woman syndrome, 18 ALR4th 1153.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of prosecution's calling as witness, to extract claim of self-incrimination privilege, one involved in offense charged against accused, 19 ALR4th 368.

Conditions interfering with accused's view of witness as violation of right of confrontation, 19 ALR4th 1286.

Waiver of right to counsel by insistence upon speedy trial in state criminal case, 19 ALR4th 1299.

Sufficiency of access to legal research facilities afforded defendant confined in state prison or local jail, 23 ALR4th 590.

Right of prosecution to discovery of case-related notes, statements, and reports — state cases, 23 ALR4th 799.

Right of accused to be present at suppression hearing or at other hearing or conference between court and attorneys concerning evidentiary questions, 23 ALR4th 955.

Validity and efficacy of minor's waiver of right to counsel — modern cases, 25 ALR4th 1072.

Validity of jury selection as affected by accused's absence from conducting of procedures for selection and impaneling of final jury panel for specific case, 33 ALR4th 429.

Admissibility or use in criminal trial of testimony given at preliminary proceeding by witness not available at trial, 38 ALR4th 378.

Necessity for presence of judge during voir dire examination of prospective jurors in state criminal case, 39 ALR4th 465.

Validity, construction and application of state recoupment statutes permitting state to recover counsel fees expended for benefit of indigent criminal defendants, 39 ALR4th 597.

Impeachment of verdict by juror's evidence that he was coerced or intimidated by fellow juror, 39 ALR4th 800.

Application of speedy trial statute to dismissal or other termination of prior indictment or information and bringing of new indictment or information, 39 ALR4th 899.

Propriety of use of multiple juries at joint trial of multiple defendants in state criminal prosecution, 41 ALR4th 1189.

Constitutionality, with respect to accused's rights to information or confrontation, of statute according confidentiality to sex crime victim's communications to sexual counselor, 43 ALR4th 395.

Propriety of governmental eavesdropping on communications between accused and his attorney, 44 ALR4th 841.

Drunk driving: motorist's right to private sobriety test, 45 ALR4th 11.

Necessity or permissibility of mental examination to determine competency or credibility of complainant in sexual offense prosecution, 45 ALR4th 310.

Juror's reading of newspaper account of trial in state criminal case during its progress as ground for mistrial, new trial or reversal, 46 ALR4th 11.

Admissibility, at criminal prosecution, of expert testimony on reliability of eyewitness testimony, 46 ALR4th 1047.

Exclusion of public from state criminal trial in order to preserve confidentiality of undercover witness, 54 ALR4th 1156.

Relief available for violation of right to counsel at sentencing in state criminal trial, 65 ALR4th 183.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: misrepresentation, or failure to advise, of immigration consequences of guilty plea — state cases, 65 ALR4th 719.

Prosecutor's appeal in criminal case to racial, national or religious prejudice as ground for mistrial, new trial, reversal or vacation of sentence — modern cases, 70 ALR4th 664.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of ballistics experts, 71 ALR4th 638.

Standing of media representatives or organizations to seek review of, or to intervene to oppose, order closing criminal proceedings to public, 74 ALR4th 476.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: use or nonuse of interpreter at prosecution of foreign language speaking defendant, 79 ALR4th 1102.

What constitutes assertion of right to counsel following Miranda warnings — state cases, 83 ALR4th 443.

Right of indigent defendant in state criminal case to assistance of psychiatrist or psychologist, 85 ALR4th 19.

When does delay in imposing sentence violate speedy trial provision, 86 ALR4th 340.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: use or nonuse of interpreter at prosecution of hearing-impaired defendant, 86 ALR4th 698.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: Compulsion, duress, necessity, or “hostage syndrome” defense, 8 ALR5th 713.

Prejudicial effect of statement by prosecutor that verdict, recommendation of punishment, or other finding by jury is subject to review or correction by other authorities, 10 ALR5th 700.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: Battered spouse syndrome as defense to homicide or other criminal offense, 11 ALR5th 871.

Criminal defendant's representation by person not licensed to practice law as violation of right to counsel, 19 ALR5th 351.

Use of peremptory challenges to exclude ethnic and racial groups, other than black americans, from criminal jury — Post-Batson state cases, 20 ALR5th 398.

Determination of indigency entitling accused in state criminal case to appointment of counsel on appeal, 26 ALR5th 765.

What persons or entities may assert or waive corporation's attorney-client privilege — modern cases, 28 ALR5th 1.

Failure or refusal of state court judge to have record made of bench conference with counsel in criminal proceeding, 31 ALR5th 704.

Right to appointment of counsel in contempt proceedings, 32 ALR5th 31.

Right of accused to have evidence or court proceedings interpreted, because accused or other participant in proceedings is not proficient in the language used, 32 ALR5th 149.

Substitution of judge in state criminal trial, 45 ALR5th 591.

Use of peremptory challenges to exclude persons from criminal jury based on religious affiliation — post-Batson state cases, 63 ALR5th 375.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — issues of mental matters concerning persons, other than counsel's client, who are involved in criminal case, 80 ALR5th 55.

Examination and challenge of state case jurors on basis of attitudes toward homosexuality, 80 ALR5th 469.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney in cases involving offenses other than drunk driving — Cases focusing on presence of inculpatory evidence other than statements by accused and cases focusing on absence of particular inculpatory evidence, 90 ALR 5th 225.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client — conduct at trial regarding issues of insanity, 95 ALR5th 125.

Denial of, or interference with, accused's right to have attorney initially contact accused, 96 ALR5th 327.

Validity and efficacy of minor's waiver of right to counsel — cases decided since application of In re Gault, 387 U.S. 1, 87 S. Ct. 1428, 18 L. Ed. 2d 527, 40 Ohio Op. 2d 378, 1967 U.S. LEXIS 1478 (U.S. 1967).

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding search and seizure issues-Motions and objections during trial and matters other than pretrial motions, 117 ALR5th 513.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney in cases involving offenses other than drunk driving — Cases focusing on presence of inculpatory statements, 90 ALR 5th 225.

Adequacy of defense counsel's representation of criminal client regarding guilty pleas - coercion or duress. 19 A.L.R.6th 411.

Effect upon accused's sixth amendment right to impartial jury of jurors having served on jury hearing matter arising out of same transaction or series of transactions, 68 ALR Fed 919.

Appointment of counsel, in civil rights action, under forma pauperis provisions (28 USC § 1915(d)), 69 ALR Fed 666.

Propriety of federal court's exclusion of public from criminal or civil trial in order to protect trade secrets, 69 ALR Fed 892.

Effect of Speedy Trial Act provision (18 USC § 3161(c)(2)) that unless defendant consents in writing to contrary, trial may not commence less than 30 days from date on which defendant first appears through counsel or expressly waives counsel or elects to proceed pro se, 71 ALR Fed 415.

Substitution of judges under Rule 25 of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, 73 ALR Fed 833.

Necessity that Miranda warnings include express reference to right to have attorney present during interrogation, 77 ALR Fed 123.

Propriety and prejudicial effect of comments by counsel vouching for credibility of witness — federal cases, 78 ALR Fed 23.

What constitutes assertion of right to counsel following Miranda warnings — federal cases, 80 ALR Fed 622.

Constitutional right to counsel as ground for quashing or modifying federal grand jury subpoena directed to attorney, 83 ALR Fed 504.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: misrepresentation, or failure to advise, of immigration consequences of waiver of jury trial, 103 ALR Fed 867.

What constitutes “fees” or “costs” within meaning of federal statutory provision (28 USCS § 1915 and similar predecessor statutes) permitting party to proceed in forma pauperis without prepayment of fees and costs or security therefor, 142 ALR Fed 627.

Right of enemy combatant to counsel, 184 ALR Fed 527.